tests/morphophonology/yazarga.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] язарга": 
     яз<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : язма
     яз<v><tv><neg><pres><p2><sg> : язмыйсың
     яз<v><tv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : язмый
     яз<v><tv><neg><pres><p1><pl> : язмыйбыз
